Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3281.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (g) of section 18A of chapter 17 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-
The department’s regulations shall include minimum standards for discharge and transfer
policies approved pursuant to subsection (i), including guidance about situations warranting the
immediate discharge or transfer of a resident.
SECTION 2. Said section 18A of said chapter 17, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(i) An operator of certified-alcohol and drug free housing shall have a written discharge
and transfer policy approved by the accredited program and the bureau. Notwithstanding chapter
186 or any other general or special law to the contrary, approved discharge and transfer policies
may allow for the immediate discharge or transfer a resident only when: (i) the transfer is
necessary for the resident's welfare; (ii) the resident's needs cannot be met at the certified sober
of 2

home; or (iii) the health and safety of other residents, employees or volunteers are at risk or
would be at risk if the resident continues to live at the residence. A person who refuses to leave a
residence after a discharge or transfer that is consistent with an approved policy may be ordered
to leave the premises by the operator or by a law enforcement officer.
of 2